Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3276.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 167B, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended
by inserting the following new section:-
Section 25:
(a) Definitions
As used in this act, the following words have the following meanings:
“Division”, the Massachusetts division of banks.
“GENIUS-compliant stablecoin”, a payment stablecoin issued by a permitted payment
stablecoin issuer as defined under the GENIUS Act and subject to federal supervision under that
act.
of 5

“Sandbox participant”, a firm, financial institution, governmental entity, or nonprofit
organization admitted into the Massachusetts digital settlement sandbox under this act.
“Settlement application” includes, but is not limited to: (1) same-day closing of
municipal notes and bonds; (2) payroll or contractor disbursements; (3) government refunds or
rebates; and (4) cross-border remittances associated with public universities or health systems.
(b) Establishment of Sandbox
The division shall establish a Massachusetts digital settlement sandbox program,
consistent with chapter 167B and chapter 169 of the General Laws. The division, in consultation
with the office of the state treasurer, the secretary of administration and finance, and the
Massachusetts technology collaborative, shall promulgate regulations for the application,
admission, and oversight of sandbox participants. Sandbox participation shall be limited to 24
months, with a possible one-time 12-month extension upon a showing of good cause.
(c) Regulatory Coordination
The division shall coordinate with federal banking regulators and the United States
Department of the Treasury to ensure compliance with the GENIUS Act, the Bank Secrecy Act,
anti-money laundering obligations, sanctions requirements, and cybersecurity and operational
risk management standards. The division shall establish information-sharing agreements with the
office of the comptroller of the currency, the federal reserve, and other relevant agencies for
sandbox participants operating in the commonwealth. Nothing in this act shall be construed to
conflict with federal law or regulations.
(d) Consumer Protection and Transparency
of 5

Sandbox participants shall provide clear disclosures to consumers and counterparties,
including: (1) the GENIUS-compliant status of the stablecoin used; (2) the 1:1 reserve
requirements and backing assets; and (3) any transaction or conversion fees. The division may
suspend or revoke sandbox participation for failure to comply with disclosure, prudential, or
anti-fraud requirements.
(e) Sandbox Incentive Fund
A sandbox incentive fund is established within the executive office of economic
development. The fund shall support sandbox participants through refundable tax credits for
qualifying payroll and research expenditures in the commonwealth or competitive grants for pilot
projects involving settlement applications. The aggregate annual amount of credits and grants
shall not exceed $15,000,000. The fund shall be financed through:
(1) A one-time seed allocation of $3,000,000, reallocated from existing appropriations to
the economic development incentive program under section 3A of chapter 23A of the General
Laws or the Massachusetts technology collaborative under section 2 of chapter 40J of the
General Laws, as determined by the secretary of economic development;
(2) Application and participation fees for sandbox participants, not to exceed $50,000 per
participant, as established by regulations promulgated by the division;
(3) A transaction fee of 0.2 per cent on the value of stablecoin transactions processed
within the sandbox, collected by participants and remitted to the fund quarterly, subject to
regulations ensuring compliance with chapter 167B and chapter 169 of the General Laws and
federal law, and avoiding duplicative assessments;
of 5

(4) Federal grants obtained through matching programs, including those administered by
the United States Economic Development Administration or United States Department of the
Treasury, with the division authorized to apply for and accept such funds;
(5) Contributions from public-private partnerships, philanthropic organizations, or
venture capital entities, solicited and accepted by the division in consultation with the executive
office of economic development, provided that such contributions align with the purposes of this
act and do not create conflicts of interest. Contributions shall be disclosed publicly in the annual
report, including source, amount, and any conditions.
The division shall promulgate regulations for the administration of the fund, including fee
structures, disbursement criteria, and reporting on fund sources and uses to ensure transparency
and fiscal responsibility.
(f) Reporting
The division shall submit an annual report to the clerks of the house of representatives
and senate, the joint committee on financial services, and the house and senate committees on
ways and means. The report shall detail: (1) the number and nature of sandbox participants; (2)
pilot use cases tested; (3) economic and fiscal impacts on the commonwealth; (4) contributions
received under section 6, subsection (e); and (5) recommendations for permanent statutory or
regulatory changes.
(g) Sunset
This act shall expire 5 years after its effective date unless reauthorized by the general
court; provided, however, that sandbox participants admitted before the expiration date may
of 5

complete their pilot periods. The division shall ensure an orderly wind-down of sandbox
activities to protect consumers and counterparties.
(h) Severability
If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid,
the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances
shall not be affected.
(i) Effective Date
This act shall take effect 90 days after its passage.
of 5